Vermont, session 2025-2026, H75.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 18 V.S.A. chapter 113 is amended to read:
CHAPTER 113. PATIENT CHOICE AT END OF LIFE
§ 5281. DEFINITIONS
As used in this chapter:
VT LEG #379402 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.75
2025 Page 2 of 16
(1) “Bona fide physician-patient clinician-patient relationship” means a
treating or consulting relationship in the course of which a physician clinician
has completed a full assessment of the patient’s medical history and current
medical condition, including a personal physical examination.
(2) “Capable” means that a patient has the ability to make and
communicate health care decisions to a physician clinician, including
communication through persons familiar with the patient’s manner of
communicating if those persons are available.
(3) “Health care facility” shall have has the same meaning as in section
9432 of this title.
(4) “Health care provider” means a person, partnership, corporation,
facility, or institution licensed or certified or authorized by law to administer
health care or dispense medication in the ordinary course of business or
practice of a profession.
(5) “Impaired judgment” means that a person does not sufficiently
understand or appreciate the relevant facts necessary to make an informed
decision.
(6) “Interested person” means:
(A) the patient’s physician clinician;
(B) a person who knows that he or she is a relative of the patient is
related to that person by blood, civil marriage, civil union, or adoption;
VT LEG #379402 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.75
2025 Page 3 of 16
(C) a person who knows that he or she would be entitled, upon the
patient’s death, that person would be entitled to any portion of the estate or
assets of the patient under any will or trust, by operation of law, or by contract;
or
(D) an owner, operator, or employee of a health care facility, nursing
home, or residential care facility where the patient is receiving medical
treatment or is a resident.
(7) “Palliative care” shall have has the same definition as in section 2 of
this title.
(8) “Patient” means a person who is 18 years of age or older and under
the care of a physician clinician.
(9) “Physician” “Clinician” means an individual who is licensed:
(A) to practice medicine under 26 V.S.A. chapter 23 or 33;
(B) as an advanced practice registered nurse under 26 V.S.A. chapter
28 to practice as a certified nurse practitioner;
(C) as a physician assistant under 26 V.S.A. chapter 31; or
(D) as a naturopathic physician under 26 V.S.A. chapter 81.
(10) “Terminal condition” means an incurable and irreversible disease
which that would, within reasonable medical judgment, result in death within
six months.
VT LEG #379402 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.75
2025 Page 4 of 16
(11) “Health care services” means services for the diagnosis, prevention,
treatment, cure, or relief of a health condition, illness, injury, or disease.
(12) “Telemedicine” means the delivery of health care services such as
diagnosis, consultation, or treatment through the use of live interactive audio
and video over a secure connection that complies with the requirements of the
Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996, Pub. L. No. 104-
191.
§ 5282. RIGHT TO INFORMATION
The rights of a patient under section 1871 of this title to be informed of all
available options related to terminal care and under 12 V.S.A. § 1909(d) to
receive answers to any specific question about the foreseeable risks and
benefits of medication without the physician’s clinician withholding any
requested information exist regardless of the purpose of the inquiry or the
nature of the information. A physician clinician who engages in discussions
with a patient related to such risks and benefits in the circumstances described
in this chapter shall not be construed to be assisting in or contributing to a
patient’s independent decision to self-administer a lethal dose of medication,
and such discussions shall not be used to establish civil or criminal liability or
professional disciplinary action.
VT LEG #379402 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.75
2025 Page 5 of 16
§ 5283. REQUIREMENTS FOR PRESCRIPTION AND
DOCUMENTATION; IMMUNITY
(a) A physician clinician shall not be subject to any civil or criminal
liability or professional disciplinary action if the physician clinician prescribes
to a patient with a terminal condition medication to be self-administered for the
purpose of hastening the patient’s death and the physician clinician affirms by
documenting in the patient’s medical record that all of the following occurred:
(1) The patient made an oral request to the physician clinician in the
physician’s clinician’s physical presence or by telemedicine, if the physician
clinician determines the use of telemedicine to be clinically appropriate, for
medication to be self-administered for the purpose of hastening the patient’s
death.
(2) Not fewer than 15 days after the first oral request, the patient made a
second oral request to the physician clinician in the physician’s clinician’s
physical presence or by telemedicine, if the physician clinician determines the
use of telemedicine to be clinically appropriate, for medication to be self-
administered for the purpose of hastening the patient’s death.
(3) At the time of the second oral request, the physician clinician offered
the patient an opportunity to rescind the request.
(4) The patient made a written request for medication to be self-
administered for the purpose of hastening the patient’s death that was signed
VT LEG #379402 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.75
2025 Page 6 of 16
by the patient in the presence of two or more witnesses who were not
interested persons, who were at least 18 years of age, and who signed and
affirmed that the patient appeared to understand the nature of the document
and to be free from duress or undue influence at the time the request was
signed.
(5) The physician clinician determined that the patient:
(A) was suffering a terminal condition, based on the physician’s
clinician’s review of the patient’s relevant medical records and a physician’s
clinician’s physical examination of the patient;
(B) was capable;
(C) was making an informed decision; and
(D) had made a voluntary request for medication to hasten the
patient’s own death.
(6) The physician clinician informed the patient in person or by
telemedicine, both verbally and in writing, of all the following:
(A) the patient’s medical diagnosis;
(B) the patient’s prognosis, including an acknowledgement that the
physician’s clinician’s prediction of the patient’s life expectancy was an
estimate based on the physician’s clinician’s best medical judgment and was
not a guarantee of the actual time remaining in the patient’s life, and that the
patient could live longer than the time predicted;
VT LEG #379402 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.75
2025 Page 7 of 16
(C) the range of treatment options appropriate for the patient and the
patient’s diagnosis;
(D) if the patient was not enrolled in hospice care, all feasible end-of-
life services, including palliative care, comfort care, hospice care, and pain
control;
(E) the range of possible results, including potential risks associated
with taking the medication to be prescribed; and
(F) the probable result of taking the medication to be prescribed.
(7) The physician clinician referred the patient to a second physician
clinician for medical confirmation of the diagnosis, prognosis, and a
determination that the patient was capable, was acting voluntarily, and had
made an informed decision.
(8) The physician clinician either verified that the patient did not have
impaired judgment or referred the patient for an evaluation by a psychiatrist,
psychologist, or clinical social worker licensed in Vermont for confirmation
that the patient was capable and did not have impaired judgment.
(9) If applicable, the physician clinician consulted with the patient’s
primary care physician clinician with the patient’s consent.
(10) The physician clinician informed the patient that the patient may
rescind the request at any time and in any manner and offered the patient an
opportunity to rescind after the patient’s second oral request.
VT LEG #379402 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.75
2025 Page 8 of 16
(11) The physician clinician ensured that all required steps were carried
out in accordance with this section and confirmed, immediately prior to writing
the prescription for medication, that the patient was making an informed
decision.
(12) The physician clinician wrote the prescription after the last to occur
of the following events:
(A) the patient’s written request for medication to hasten the patient’s
own death;
(B) the patient’s second oral request; and
(C) the physician’s clinician’s offering the patient an opportunity to
rescind the request.
(13) The physician clinician either:
(A) dispensed the medication directly, provided that at the time the
physician clinician dispensed the medication, the physician clinician was
licensed to dispense medication in Vermont, had a current Drug Enforcement
Administration certificate, and complied with any applicable administrative
rules; or
(B) with the patient’s written consent:
(i) contacted a pharmacist and informed the pharmacist of the
prescription; and
VT LEG #379402 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.75
2025 Page 9 of 16
(ii) delivered the written prescription personally or by mail or
facsimile to the pharmacist, who dispensed the medication to the patient, the
physician clinician, or an expressly identified agent of the patient.
(14) The physician clinician recorded and filed the following in the
patient’s medical record:
(A) the date, time, and wording of all oral requests of the patient for
medication to hasten the patient’s own death;
(B) all written requests by the patient for medication to hasten the
patient’s own death;
(C) the physician’s clinician’s diagnosis, prognosis, and basis for the
determination that the patient was capable, was acting voluntarily, and had
made an informed decision;
(D) the second physician’s clinician’s diagnosis, prognosis, and
verification that the patient was capable, was acting voluntarily, and had made
an informed decision;
(E) the physician’s clinician’s attestation that the patient was enrolled
in hospice care at the time of the patient’s oral and written requests for
medication to hasten the patient’s own death or that the physician clinician
informed the patient of all feasible end-of-life services;
(F) the physician’s clinician’s verification that the patient either did
not have impaired judgment or that the physician clinician referred the patient
VT LEG #379402 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.75
2025 Page 10 of 16
for an evaluation and the person conducting the evaluation has determined that
the patient did not have impaired judgment;
(G) a report of the outcome and determinations made during any
evaluation which that the patient may have received;
(H) the date, time, and wording of the physician’s clinician’s offer to
the patient to rescind the request for medication at the time of the patient’s
second oral request; and
(I) a note by the physician clinician indicating that all requirements
under this section were satisfied and describing all of the steps taken to carry
out the request, including a notation of the medication prescribed.
(15) After writing the prescription, the physician clinician promptly
filed a report with the Department of Health documenting completion of all of
the requirements under this section.
(b) This section shall not be construed to limit civil or criminal liability for
gross negligence, recklessness, or intentional misconduct.
* * *
§ 5285. LIMITATIONS ON ACTIONS
(a) A physician clinician, nurse, pharmacist, or other person shall not be
under any duty, by law or contract, to participate in the provision of a lethal
dose of medication to a patient.
VT LEG #379402 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.75
2025 Page 11 of 16
(b) A health care facility or health care provider shall not subject a
physician clinician, nurse, pharmacist, or other person to discipline,
suspension, loss of license, loss of privileges, or other penalty for actions taken
in good faith reliance on the provisions of this chapter or refusals to act under
this chapter.
(c) No physician clinician, nurse, pharmacist, or other person licensed,
certified, or otherwise authorized by law to deliver health care services in this
State shall be subject to civil or criminal liability or professional disciplinary
action for acting in good faith compliance with the provisions of this chapter.
(d) Except as otherwise provided in this section and sections 5283, 5289,
and 5290 of this title, nothing in this chapter shall be construed to limit liability
for civil damages resulting from negligent conduct or intentional misconduct
by any person.
§ 5286. HEALTH CARE FACILITY EXCEPTION
A health care facility may prohibit a physician clinician from writing a
prescription for a dose of medication intended to be lethal for a patient who is a
resident in its facility and intends to use the medication on the facility’s
premises, provided the facility has notified the physician clinician in writing of
its policy with regard to the prescriptions. Notwithstanding subsection 5285(b)
of this title, any physician clinician who violates a policy established by a
VT LEG #379402 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.75
2025 Page 12 of 16
health care facility under this section may be subject to sanctions otherwise
allowable under law or contract.
§ 5287. INSURANCE POLICIES; PROHIBITIONS
(a) A person and his or her the person’s beneficiaries shall not be denied
benefits under a life insurance policy, as defined in 8 V.S.A. § 3301, for
actions taken in accordance with this chapter.
(b) The sale, procurement, or issue of any medical professional malpractice
insurance policy or the rate charged for the policy shall not be conditioned
upon or affected by whether the physician clinician is willing or unwilling to
participate in the provisions of this chapter.
* * *
§ 5292. STATUTORY CONSTRUCTION
Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to authorize a physician clinician
or any other person to end a patient’s life by lethal injection, mercy killing, or
active euthanasia. Action taken in accordance with this chapter shall not be
construed for any purpose to constitute suicide, assisted suicide, mercy killing,
or homicide under the law. This section shall not be construed to conflict with
section 1553 of the Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act, Pub. L. No.
111-148, as amended by the Health Care and Education Reconciliation Act of
2010, Pub. L. No. 111-152.
* * *
VT LEG #379402 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.75
2025 Page 13 of 16
Sec. 2. 18 V.S.A. § 9708 is amended to read:
§ 9708. AUTHORITY AND OBLIGATIONS OF HEALTH CARE
PROVIDERS, HEALTH CARE FACILITIES, AND RESIDENTIAL
CARE FACILITIES REGARDING DNR ORDERS AND COLST
(a) As used in this section, “clinician” shall have has the same meaning as
in section 9701 of this title and shall also include a naturopathic physician
licensed pursuant to 26 V.S.A. chapter 81 and to a duly licensed medical
doctor, osteopathic physician, advanced practice registered nurse or nurse
practitioner, naturopathic physician, or physician assistant who treated the
patient outside Vermont and held a valid license to practice in the state in
which the patient was located at the time the DNR/COLST was issued.
(b) A DNR order and a COLST shall be issued on the Department of
Health’s “Vermont DNR/COLST form” as designated by rule by the
Department of Health.
(c) Notwithstanding subsection (b) of this section, health care facilities and
residential care facilities may document DNR/COLST orders in the patient’s
medical record in a facility-specific manner when the patient is in their care.
(d) A DNR order must:
(1) be signed by the patient’s clinician;
VT LEG #379402 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.75
2025 Page 14 of 16
(2) certify that the clinician has consulted, or made an effort to consult,
with the patient, and the patient’s agent or guardian, if there is an appointed
agent or guardian;
(3) include either:
(A) the name of the patient; agent; guardian, in accordance with
14 V.S.A. § 3075(g); or surrogate giving informed consent for the DNR and
the individual’s relationship to the patient; or
(B) certification that the patient’s clinician and one other named
clinician have determined that resuscitation would not prevent the imminent
death of the patient, should the patient experience cardiopulmonary arrest; and
(4) if the patient is in a health care facility or a residential care facility,
certify that the requirements of the facility’s DNR protocol required by section
9709 of this title have been met.
(e) A COLST must:
(1) be signed by the patient’s clinician; and
(2) include the name of the patient; agent; guardian, in accordance with
14 V.S.A. § 3075(g); or surrogate giving informed consent for the COLST and
the individual’s relationship to the patient.
(f) [Repealed.]
(g) A patient’s clinician issuing a DNR/COLST order shall:
VT LEG #379402 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.75
2025 Page 15 of 16
(1) place a copy of the completed DNR/COLST order in the patient’s
medical record; and
(2) provide instructions to the patient as to the appropriate means of
displaying the DNR/COLST order.
(h) A clinician who issues a DNR order shall authorize issuance of a DNR
identification to the patient. Uniform minimum requirements for DNR
identification shall be determined by the Department of Health by rule not later
than January 1, 2016.
(i) Every health care provider, health care facility, and residential care
facility shall honor a DNR/COLST order or a DNR identification unless the
provider or facility:
(1) believes in good faith, after consultation with the agent or guardian
where possible and appropriate, that:
(A) the patient wishes to have the DNR/COLST order revoked; or
(B) the patient with the DNR identification is not the individual for
whom the DNR order was issued; and
(2) documents the basis for the good faith belief in the patient’s medical
record.
(j) A DNR/COLST order executed prior to July 1, 2011 shall be a valid
order if the document complies with the statutory requirements in effect at the
time the document was executed or with the provisions of this chapter.
VT LEG #379402 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.75
2025 Page 16 of 16
(k) A health care provider shall honor in good faith an out-of-state DNR
order, orders for life sustaining treatment, or out-of-state DNR identification if
there is no reason to believe that what has been presented is invalid.
(l) A DNR order precludes efforts to resuscitate only in the event of
cardiopulmonary arrest and does not affect other therapeutic interventions that
may be appropriate for the patient.
Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #379402 v.1